"
 W01: Trustworthy Federated LearningW03: 13th Multidisciplinary Workshop on Advances in Preference Handling (M-PREF22)W04: The Fourth Workshop on Financial Technology and Natural Language Processing (FinNLP-2022)W05: AIofAI 2022: 2nd Workshop on Adverse Impacts and Collateral Effects of AI TechnologiesW06: Workshop on Agents and Robots for reliable Engineered Autonomy (AREA)W08: Ad Hoc TeamworkW09: The 2nd International Workshop on Heuristic Search in Industry (HSI)W10: What can FCA do for Artificial Intelligence? (Tenth Workshop Edition)W11: First International Workshop on Spatio-Temporal Reasoning and LearningW14: 12th International Workshop on Agents in Traffic and Transportation (ATT 2022)W16: The Eleventh International Workshop on Statistical Relational Artificial IntelligenceW17: Cognitive Aspects of Knowledge RepresentationW18: Workshop on Artificial Intelligence Safety (AISafety)W19: 35th International Workshop on Qualitative ReasoningW20: MRC 2022 – 13th International Workshop on Modelling and Reasoning in ContextW21: Explainable AI (XAI) WorkshopW22: The 13th International Workshop on Agent-based Complex Automated NegotiationsW25: Third International Workshop on Human Brain and Artificial Intelligence (HBAI 2022)W26: NASO 2022 – Workshop on New Architectures for Search and OptimizationW27: Evaluation Beyond MetricsW28: Safe RL WorkshopW31: Scarce Data in Artificial Intelligence for Healthcare (SDAIH)W32: Communication in Human-AI InteractionsW36: Process Management in the AI era (PMAI)W39: CDCEO 2022 – Workshop on Complex Data Challenges in Earth ObservationW41: Semantic Techniques for Narrative-based UnderstandingW43: Workshop on Generalization in PlanningW44: Artificial Intelligence for Time Series Analysis: Theory, Algorithms, and ApplicationsW45: Workshop on the Interactions between Analogical Reasoning and Machine LearningW48: The 2nd International Workshop on Artificial Intelligence for Autonomous Driving (AI4AD @ IJCAI-ECAI 2022)W49: Fourth Workshop on Bridging the Gap Between AI Planning and Reinforcement Learning (PRL)W50: The fifth Data Science Meets Optimization (DSO)W51: Workshop on AI for understanding the Ocean and Climate Change ",2022
"
Scheduling InformationFor up-to-date information on date, time, and location of the workshops below, we refer to the IJCAI 2022 Schedule. ",2022
"
 



",2022
"
W01: Trustworthy Federated LearningHan Yu, Zehui Xiong, Lixin Fan, Qiang Yang, Boi Faltings, Randy GoebelFederated learning (FL) addresses several relevant challenges in this space and it has thus become an important research area in machine learning and AI at large. Federated learning can be used when one wants to train a machine learning model based on a dataset stored across multiple locations, without the ability to move the data to any central location. This seemingly mild restriction renders many of the state-of-the-art techniques in machine learning impractical. One class of applications arises when data is generated by different users of a smartphone app, staying on users’ phones for privacy reasons. Another class of applications involves data collected by different organizations, unable to share due to confidentiality reasons. Nevertheless, the same restrictions can also be present independent of privacy concerns, such as the case of data streams collected by IoT devices or self-driving cars, which need to be processed on-device, be-cause it is infeasible to transmit and store the sheer amount of data. This workshop aims to bring together academic researchers and industry practitioners with common interests in this domain to address open issues. For industry participants, we intend to create a forum to communicate what kind of problems are practically relevant. For academic participants, we hope to make it easier to become productive in this area. The workshop will focus on the theme of building trustwor-thiness into federated learning to enable FL solutions to be more readily applicable to solve real-world problems. The notion of trustworthiness will include, but not limited to, interpretability, fairness, verifiability, transparency, audita-bility, privacy-preservation, robustness to misbehaviours, and setting up healthy market mechanisms to enable open dynamic collaboration among data owners under the FL paradigm.W03: 13th Multidisciplinary Workshop on Advances in Preference Handling (M-PREF22)Meltem Ozturk, Paolo Viappiani, Destercke Sebastien, Christophe LabreucheHuman-centered AI requires that AI systems are able to adapt to humans, to understand the preferences underlying human choice behavior, and to take them into account when interacting with humans or when acting on their behalf. Preference models are needed in decision-support systems such as web-based recommender systems, in digital assistants and chatbots, in automated problem solvers such as configurators, and in autonomous systems such as Mars rovers. Nearly all areas of artificial intelligence deal with choice situations and can thus benefit from computational methods for handling preferences while gaining new capabilities such as explainability and revisability of choices. Preference handling is also important for machine learning as preferences may guide learning behaviour and be subject of dedicated learning methods. Moreover, social choice methods are of key importance in computational domains such as multi-agent systems. Preferences are studied in many areas of artificial intelligence such as knowledge representation & reasoning, multi-agent systems, game theory, computational social choice, constraint satisfaction, logic programming and non-monotonic reasoning, decision making, decision-theoretic planning, and beyond. Preferences are inherently a multi-disciplinary topic, of interest to economists, computer scientists, operations researchers, mathematicians and more. This broad set of application areas leads to new types of preference models, new problems for applying preference structures, and new kinds of benefits. The workshop on Advances in Preference Handling studies these questions and addresses all computational aspects of preference handling. It will be 13th edition of this workshop ; previous ones have been held at different IJCAI, ECAI, AAAI or VLD conferences. We expect 20-30 submissions and 30 attendees. Each submission will be reviewed by at least two referees and thinking of having a special issue in a journal with an open call.https://sites.google.com/view/m-pref2022W04: The Fourth Workshop on Financial Technology and Natural Language Processing (FinNLP-2022)Hsin-Hsi Chen, Hiroya Takamura, Hen-Hsen Huang, Chung-Chi ChenWe plan to organize a half-day workshop related to natural language processing (NLP) for financial technology (FinTech), FinNLP-2022. Besides the regular paper submission, we cooperate with Fortia Financial Solutions to extend the shared task in FinNLP-2019, FinNLP-2020, and FinNLP-2021, which are also in conjunction with IJCAI-2019, IJCAI-2020, and IJCAI-2021. If IJCAI-2022 will be a virtual conference, the workshop program is expected to include two oral sessions as previous FinNLP workshops. That is, all accepted papers will be presented in the oral method. However, if IJCAI-2021 will be a physical conference, we will separate the accepted paper into oral and poster presentations based on reviewers’ comments.https://sites.google.com/nlg.csie.ntu.edu.tw/finnlp-2022/W05: AIofAI 2022: 2nd Workshop on Adverse Impacts and Collateral Effects of AI TechnologiesEsma Aimeur, Nicolás E Díaz Ferreyra, Hicham HageThe role of Artificial Intelligence (AI) in people’s everyday life has grown exponentially over the last decade. Currently, individuals rely heavily on intelligent software applications across different domains including healthcare, logistics, defence, and governance. Particularly, AI systems facilitate decision-making processes across these domains through the automatic analysis and classification of large data sets and the subsequent identification of relevant patterns. To a large extent, such an approach has contributed to the sustainable development of modern societies and remains a powerful instrument for social and economic growth. However, recent events related to the massive spread of misinformation and deepfakes, along with large privacy and security breaches, have raised concerns among AI practitioners and researchers about the negative and detrimental impacts of these technologies. Hence, there is an urgent call for guidelines, methods, and techniques to assess and mitigate the potentially adverse impacts and side effects of AI applications. This workshop explores how and up to which extent AI technologies can serve deceptive and malicious purposes either intentionally or not. Furthermore, it seeks to elaborate on countermeasures and mitigation actions to prevent potential negative effects and collateral damages of AI systems.https://sites.google.com/view/aiofai-2022/W06: Agents and Robots for reliable Engineered Autonomy (AREA)Rafael C. Cardoso, Angelo Ferrando, Fabio Papacchini, Mehrnoosh Askarpour, Louise A Dennis Autonomous agents is a well-established area that has been researched for decades, both from a design and implementation viewpoint. Nonetheless, the application of agents in real world scenarios has largely been adopted in applications which are primarily software based, and remains limited in applications which involve physical interaction. In parallel, robots are no longer used only in tightly constrained industrial applications, but are instead being applied to an increasing number of domains, ranging from robotic assistants to search and rescue, where the working environment is both dynamic and underspecified, and may involve interactions between multiple robots and humans. This presents significant challenges to traditional software engineering methodologies. Increased autonomy is an important route to enabling robotic applications to function in these environments and autonomous agents and multi-agent systems are a promising approach to their engineering. However, as autonomy and interaction increases, the engineering of reliable behaviour becomes more challenging (both in robotic applications and in more traditional autonomous agent settings) and so there is a need for researching new approaches to verification and validation that can be integrated in the engineering lifecycle of these systems. This workshop aims to bring together researchers from the autonomous agents and the robotics communities, since combining knowledge coming from these two research areas may lead to innovative approaches that solve complex problems related with the verification and validation of autonomous robotic systems. Consequently, we encourage submissions that combine agents, robots, software engineering, and verification, but we also welcome papers focused on one of these areas, as long as their applicability to the other areas is clear.https://areaworkshop.github.io/AREA2022/W08: Ad Hoc TeamworkMuhammad A Rahman, Elliot Fosong, William Macke, Sam Devlin, Ignacio Carlucho, Reuth MirskyAd hoc teamwork is defined as a challenge to design autonomous agents that can collaborate with new teammates without prior coordination. Related problems include zero-shot coordination, agent modeling, and human-agent collaborations. The aim of this workshop is to build a united, supportive research community for ad hoc teamwork and these related problems. It will facilitate discussions between different research labs in academia and industry, identify the main attributes that can vary between ad-hoc teamwork tasks, and discuss the progress that has been made in this field so far, while identifying the next immediate, and long-term open problems the community should address.https://sites.google.com/view/ad-hoc-teamworkw09: The 2nd International Workshop on Heuristic Search in Industry (HSI)Shaowei Cai, Nathan R SturtevantWe propose a full-day workshop (with 8 accepted papers, 1 keynote, 3 invited talks, 1 panel, and 1 poster) at IJCAI-ECAI 2022 for professionals, researchers, and practitioners who are interested in leveraging heuristic search to efficiently solve industrial problems. This workshop will be guided by leadership from steering committee members and program committee members in the heuristic search area of AI, from both academia and industry.https://hsi-workshop.github.io/W10: What can FCA do for Artificial Intelligence? (Tenth Workshop Edition)Sergei Kuznetsov, Amedeo Napoli, Sebastian RudolphThis is a proposal for organizing the tenth edition of the FCA4AI workshop (see http://www.fca4ai.hse.ru/). Formal Concept Analysis (FCA) is a mathematically well-founded theory aimed at classification and knowledge discovery that can be used for many purposes in Artificial Intelligence (AI). The objective of the workshop is to investigate several issues such as: how can FCA support various AI activities (knowledge discovery, knowledge engineering, machine learning, data mining, information retrieval, recommendation…), how can FCA be extended in order to help AI researchers to solve new and complex problems in their domains, and how FCA can play a role in current trends in AI such as explainable AI and fairness of algorithms in decision making.https://fca4ai.hse.ru/2022/W11: First International Workshop on Spatio-Temporal Reasoning and LearningMichael Sioutis, Zhiguo Long, John G Stell, Jochen RenzWe propose to hold the first international workshop on Spatio-Temporal Reasoning and Learning, a cross-discipline workshop that aims to foster exchange of ideas between the Machine Learning and the Symbolic AI communities, especially in the context of handling spatio-temporal knowledge.https://strl2022.github.io/W14: 12th International Workshop on Agents in Traffic and Transportation (ATT 2022)Giuseppe Vizzari, Ana Bazzan, Ivana Dusparic, Marin LujakWorkshop proposal for the 12th International Workshop on Agents in Traffic and Transportation (ATT 2022) to be held in the context of IJCAI2022ttps://sites.google.com/unimib.it/att2022/W16: The Eleventh International Workshop on Statistical Relational Artificial IntelligenceSebastijan Dumancic, Angelika Kimmig, David Poole, Jay PujaraThe purpose of the Statistical Relational AI (StarAI) workshop is to bring together researchers and practitioners from three fields: logical (or relational) AI/learning, probabilistic (or statistical) AI/learning and neural approaches for AI/learning with knowledge graphs and other structured data. These fields share many key features and often solve similar problems and tasks. Until recently, however, research in them has progressed independently with little or no interaction. The fields often use different terminology for the same concepts and, as a result, keeping up and understanding the results in the other field is cumbersome, thus slowing down research. Our long term goal is to change this by achieving synergy between logical, statistical and neural AI. http://starai.org/W17: Cognitive Aspects of Knowledge RepresentationJesse Heyninck, Gabriele Kern-Isberner, Thomas Meyer, Marco RagniKnowledge representation is a lively and well-established field of AI, where knowledge and belief is represented declaratively and suitable for machine processing. It is often claimed that this declarative nature makes knowledge representation cognitively more adequate than e.g. sub-symbolic approaches, such as machine learning. This cognitive adequacy has important ramifications for the explainability of approaches in knowledge representation, which on its turn is essential for the trustworthiness of these approaches. However, exactly how cognitive adequacy is ensured has been often left implicit, and connections with cognitive science and psychology are only recently being taken up. The goal of this workshop is to bring together experts from fields including artificial intelligence, psychology, cognitive science and philosophy to discuss important questions related to cognitive aspects of knowledge representation.http://cakr22.krportal.org/W18: Artificial Intelligence Safety (AISafety)Gabriel Pedroza, Jose Hernandez-Orallo, Xin Cynthia Chen, Xiaowei Huang, Huascar Espinoza, Mauricio Castillo-Effen, John McDermid, Richard MallahIn the last decade, there has been a growing concern on the risks of Artificial Intelligence (AI). Safety is becoming increasingly relevant as humans are progressively ruled out from the decisions and control loops of intelligent systems. In particular, the technical foundations and assumptions on which traditional safety engineering principles are based, are inadequate for systems in which AI algorithms, in particular Machine Learning (ML) algorithms, are interacting with the physical world at increasingly higher levels of autonomy. We must also consider the connection between the safety challenges posed by present-day AI systems, and more forward-looking research focused on more capable future AI systems, up to and including Artificial General Intelligence (AGI). This workshop seeks to explore new ideas on AI safety with particular focus on addressing the following questions: *How can we engineer trustable AI software architectures? *Do we need to specify and use bounded morality in system engineering to make AI-based systems more ethically aligned? *What is the status of existing approaches in ensuring AI and ML safety and what are the gaps? *What safety engineering considerations are required to develop safe human-machine interaction in automated decision-making systems? *What AI safety considerations and experiences are relevant from industry? *How can we characterise or evaluate AI systems according to their potential risks and vulnerabilities? *How can we develop solid technical visions and paradigm shift articles about AI Safety? *How do metrics of capability and generality affect the level of risk of a system and how trade-offs can be found with performance? *How do AI systems feature for example ethics, explainability, transparency, and accountability relate to, or contribute to, its safety? *How to evaluate AI safety?https://www.aisafetyw.org/W19: 35th International Workshop on Qualitative ReasoningNúria AgellThe Qualitative Reasoning (QR) community is involved with the development and application of qualita-tive representations to understand the world from incomplete, imprecise, or uncertain data. Qualitative representations have been used to model natural systems (e.g., physics, biology, ecology, geology), social systems (e.g., economics, cultural decision-making), cognitive systems (e.g., conceptual learning, spatial reasoning, intelligent tutors, robotics), technical systems (e.g., manufacturing, robotics) and more. QR connects to several AI subfields commonly represented at AI conferences such as IJCAI, AAAI, E-CAI. As QR strives to capture the everyday reasoning that comes naturally to humans, its method con-tribute to explainable AI. QR has a long tradition as a workshop and has been co-located with major AI conferences over the last several years.https://www.esade.edu/en/faculty-and-research/research/knowledge-units/institute-for-data-driven-decisions/research/juice/international-workshop-on-qualitative-reasoning-workshopW20: MRC 2022 – 13th International Workshop on Modelling and Reasoning in ContextJörg Cassens, Rebekah Wegener, Anders Kofod-PetersenWe propose to organise MRC at ICJAI-ECAI 2022 as the thirteenth in a series of workshops that was started in 2004 at the German Conference on Artificial Intelligence and made its first international appearance in 2005 at IJCAI in Edinburgh, Scotland. MRC is an interdisciplinary and highly interactive workshop with a focus on applications within computer science. However, MRC has always had a strong interdisciplinary appeal and does draw from fields such as linguistics, semiotics, philosophy, mathematics, cognitive science, social sciences and psychology as well as various sub-fields within computer science. MRC has traditionally been held on major AI-conferences such as ECAI, IJCAI and AAAI or conferences focusing on context from different perspectives such as the International and Interdisciplinary Conference on Modeling and Using Context (CONTEXT). These workshops have been successful in raising awareness about the importance of context as a major issue for future intelligent systems, especially in ambient and ubiquitous computing and current research on autononomous systems. At the same time, advances in methodologies for modelling and retrieving context have been made and MRC continues to provide a venue for the discussion and furthering of research into issues surrounding context. With the renewed interest in Artificial Intelligence in general and Machine Learning in particular, we think it is crucial to assure a human-centric perspective, and a closer collaboration between the fields of Artificial Intelligence and Human-Computer Interaction is a necessity. With context being a central concept both in HCI and in AI, we think that the workshop is ideally suited to help further such a human-centric perspective.http://mrc.kriwi.de/2022/W21: Explainable AI (XAI) Workshop Proposal @ IJCAI-22Tim Miller, Rosina Weber, Ofra AmirWe propose this Explainable AI workshop as a continuation of the highly successful workshops on Explainable AI held at IJCAI-17 (Melbourne), IJCAI-18 (Stockholm), IJCAI-19 )Macau), and IJCAI-20 (Tokyo/online) focusing on issues pertaining to explainability and interpretability in artificial intelligence (AI), and with a particular focus on the interdisciplinary nature of this challenging area.https://sites.google.com/view/xai2022W22: The 13th International Workshop on Agent-based Complex Automated NegotiationsRafik Hadfi, Takayuki Ito, Reyhan Aydoğan, Ryuta ArisakaComplex Automated Negotiation is one of the emerging areas of research in the field of Multiagent Systems. Future AI systems are posed to act in complex situations and need to have coordination mechanisms based on automated negotiation technologies. In this context, automated negotiations deal with encounters where we may have for instance, a large number of agents, a large number of issues, real-time constraints, concurrent and interdependent negotiation, and so forth. Software agents can support the automation of complex negotiations by negotiating on behalf of their owners and finding adequate strategies to achieve realistic, win-win agreements. The proposed workshop, namely, the “13th International Workshop on Agent-based Complex Automated Negotiations” (ACAN2022), will address key topics in the area of automated negotiation research within the general field of multiagent systems. A considerable number of researchers in various communities of autonomous agents and multiagent systems are actively working on related issues. They are, for instance, being studied in agent negotiations, multi-issue negotiations, auctions, mechanism design, electronic commerce, voting, secure protocols, matchmaking and brokering, argumentation, co-operation mechanisms and distributed optimization. The goal of this workshop is to bring together researchers from these communities to learn about each other’s work, encourages the exchange of ideas, and potentially fosters long-term research collaborations. Automated negotiations have traditionally been one of the main topics within the IJCAI research community. Thus, the workshop is highly relevant to the topics of the main conference. This workshop will additionally create opportunities for researchers and experts who cannot present their results or on-going research contents in the main conference (for example, because their work is too specialized or preliminary in nature), and thus will complement the main conference.https://sites.google.com/view/ijcai-acan2022W25: Third International Workshop on Human Brain and Artificial Intelligence (HBAI 2022)Xiaomin YingThe quest for brain research is to uncover the nature of brain cognition, consciousness, and intelligence. Artificial Intelligence (AI) is committed to the realization of machine-borne intelligence. The development of these two fields is undergoing a continuous trend of crossvergence and convergence. To bring together active researchers and practitioners in the frontiers of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Human Brain Research for the presentation of original research results, and provide an opportunity for the exchange and dissemination of innovative research ideas relevant to both fields, we propose this workshop, called Human Brain and Artificial Intelligence (HBAI). HBAI will contribute to answering the following two questions: How can AI techniques help human brain research (AI- inspired/powered brain research)? And, how can human brain research inspire the study of AI (brain-inspired computing)? The discussions on the workshop will clearly be greatly helpful to the brain and cognitive science, neural computation and artificial general intelligence, brain-computer interface, data science, and their applications.https://hbai2022.github.io/index.htmlW26: NASO 2022 – Workshop on New Architectures for Search and OptimizationPhilippe CodognetNASO 2022 – “Workshop on New Architectures for Search and Optimization”https://sites.google.com/view/naso-2022W27: Evaluation Beyond MetricsJosé Hernández-Orallo, Lucy Cheke, Joshua Tenenbaum, Tomer Ullman, Fernando Martínez-Plume, Danaja Rutar, Ryan Burnell, John Burden, Wout SchellaertThis workshop will welcome formalizations, methodologies and test benches for the evaluation of AI systems. More specifically, we are interested in theoretical or experimental research focused on the development of concepts, tools and clear indicators and evaluation to characterize and measure AI systems and how this relates to, among others, cognitive abilities and skills, as well as rates of development, progress and impact. We consider regular papers, short papers, demo papers about benchmarks or tools, and position papers, and encourage discussions over a broad list of topics (not exhaustive): – Evaluation methods founded on cognitive, developmental or comparative psychology – Measurement of skills, capabilities, or cognitive abilities – Evaluation methods based on software testing or other engineering practises – Meta-analysis or comparisons of evaluation instruments – The role of evaluation in AI development, policy making, and modelling of social impact – Measurements of generality or common-sense – Capture and use of evaluation data, e.g for error analysis or calibration – Analysis of the task space and its relation to corresponding capabilities – The role of causality in evaluation – Topics complementary to evaluation such as documentation or auditing – Alternative evaluation methods with added benefits, e.g. granularity, use of population data, black box, capture of emergent behavior, non-additive aggregation of results, interpretability of the results, improved validity – Discussion and progress in hard to evaluate scenarios, e.g. developmental robotics, multi-agent systems, tightly human coupled systems, artificial social ecosystems, conversational bots, language models, (multimodal) generative systems, open ended learning, lifelong learning.https://sites.google.com/view/ebem2022w28: Safe RL WorkshopDavid Bossens, Bettina Könighofer, Roderick Bloem, Stephen GiguereReinforcement learning is the dominant paradigm for an agent to learn interactively with its environment. Despite impressive gains in areas such as gaming, for many real-world applications, such as robotic systems or autonomous cars, RL agents are currently not employed because they are not safe. Learning by trial-and-error often comes with dangerous side-effects, leading to the challenge of safe exploration. Moreover, learned RL policies must meet certain desirability criteria, where some behaviours need to be prevented at all costs. These and related issues are of primary concern in the field of safe reinforcement learning. To achieve safe reinforcement learning, a variety of angles have been taken recently. From a techincal point of view, researchers have brought together insights from constrained optimisation, robust optimisation, model-based reinforcement learning, formal methods, control theory, statistical hypothesis testing, etc. From a more societal point of view, researchers have investigated how to adjust the environment, to restrict the autonomy of the agent, and how humans can intervene for safe RL. Since IJCAI brings together a large audience within the AI community with lots of prior interest being demonstrated in the fields of safety, reinforcement learning, robustness, and robotics in the wild, we propose the Safe RL 2022 Workshop at IJCAI 2022. The workshop is proposed as a combination of invited talks and contributed talks with opportunities for researchers to interact with the speakers, discuss novel and exciting research, and establish new and fruitful collaborations.https://sites.google.com/view/safe-rl-2022W31: Scarce Data in Artificial Intelligence for Healthcare (SDAIH)Simone Lionetti, Alexander Navarini, Marc Pouly, Philipp TschandlAI has the potential to generate a revolution in the field of healthcare by enabling accurate, fast and reliable analyses of data at an unprecedented scale both in the clinics and in industry. Leveraged properly, AI can thus allow to better meet patient needs by developing new medical devices, drugs, and personalized treatments, while simultaneously freeing up time for clinical staff to nourish the profound human connection between caregivers and patients. Moreover, AI promises to democratize the healthcare system by spreading basic services to low-income or remote areas through telemedicine. Notwithstanding the terrific progress achieved in the last two decades, many AI projects related to medicine struggle to make their way to deployment and sustainable productivity because of the limited availability of high-quality annotated data. The scarcity of useful information is often exacerbated in medicine, medical engineering, and healthcare in general because labelling requires highly-specialized staff, patient privacy must be respected, ethnic differences and rare diseases adequately represented. Despite the incredible advances of the last few years in facilitating data collection and annotation, learning representations, and detecting different types of bias, basic observations on implications for practitioners are often lacking, new ingenious ideas are flourishing, and recommendations for healthcare are far from established. The goal of this workshop is to exchange learnings and efforts on how to solve the issue of data scarcity for the practical deployment of AI in healthcare. We aim at bringing together, from both academia and industry, researchers and data scientists that are confronted with challenges related to limited data availability for machine learning in medicine, medical engineering, biotechnology, pharmaceuticals, and medical services.https://hslu-abiz.github.io/sdaih22/W32: Communication in Human-AI InteractionsJennifer Renoux, Antti Oulasvirta, Mohamed Chetouani, Andrew Howes, Jasmin GrosingerHuman interactions with AI systems are becoming part of our everyday life. If designed and developed efficiently, these interactions have great potential in enhancing human work, abilities, and well-being. Communication, here the iterative process of establishing shared meaning, is a crucial aspect of successful interaction and has been studied for years, from AI, HCI, and cognitive sciences points of view, among others. However, we can observe paradoxically relatively little interaction between these communities, even though collaboration would greatly benefit all of them. The goal of this workshop is to bring together experts from these different communities to explore and understand the specificities and characteristics of communication in human-AI interactions, as well as the salient principles, methods, and theories one has to consider to build meaningful human-AI communication systems.https://chai-workshop.github.io/W36: Process Management in the AI era (PMAI)Antonella Guzzo, Giuseppe De Giacomo, Marco Montali, Tathagata Chakraborty, Fabiana Fournier, Lior LimonadProcess Management (PM) is a growing multidisciplinary discipline combining insights from operation management, computer science, and data science. The development of AI techniques is paving the way towards a new generation of information systems able to “augment” process management, making them more autonomous, adaptive, intelligent, self-optimizing. To support these sophisticated forms of decision-making, they will need to extract useful insights from the execution logs of ongoing/past process executions, so as to strengthen, integrate, and continuously revise their domain knowledge. This poses foundational, conceptual, and technical challenges related to the integration of symbolic and sub-symbolic AI techniques, and how to infuse them within PM. At the same time, delegating autonomy brings pressing requirements on the trustworthiness of such systems, and on their ability to interact with human experts and explain their own behavior. The workshop aims at bringing together researchers from different research disciplines and a strong interest in promoting the synergy between AI and PM to address the above frontier challenges. Although the AI community of IJCAI and AAAI hosted some of the first events dedicated to business processes, over the years, the business process community has found its own place (see. BPM and ICPM conferences). Now, thanks to the advancement of artificial intelligence techniques and the need to use them in business applications, the two communities are getting closer. With this workshop, we intend to empower this trend and offer the AI audience the challenges and recent developments in the area. We welcome not only contributions that empower PM with AI techniques, but also contributions that exploit their combination to solve more general problems in AI.https://pmai-ijcai.github.io/call_for_papers/W39: CDCEO 2022 – Complex Data Challenges in Earth ObservationAleksandra Gruca, Pedram Ghamisi, Fabio Pacifici, Naoto Yokoya, Sepp HochreiterThe Big Data accumulating from remote sensing technology in ground, aerial, and satellite-based Earth Observation (EO) has radically changed how we monitor the state of our planet. Advanced EO sensors nowadays generate rich streams of data around the clock. Using recent techniques from signal processing and machine learning allows for an effective interpretation of such complex datasets. In this workshop we will bring together leading researchers from both academia and industry across diverse domains, including experts in remote sensing, EO, computer vision, signal processing, pattern recognition, data mining, big data processing, and AI. We build on the success of CDCEO’21 at the ACM CIKM, attracting over 40 submissions from 17 countries. CDCEO is the first workshop that is fully dedicated to all relevant aspects of AI in the EO community whose scopes are comprehensive and not bound to a specific application or a specific type of EO data. The ever-growing availability of high-resolution remote sensing data increasingly confronts researchers with the unique machine learning challenges posed by characteristic heterogeneity and correlation structures in these data. Data collections are typically multi-source and multi-scale, and have isometric representations. The multi-dimensional measurements over time reflect dynamic states with complex interdependencies. A better understanding of these will aid both short- and long-term progress in Earth system research. The latest generation of optical sensors features high spatial resolution and high temporal collection frequencies, allowing application of modern data-hungry methods characteristic of AI. The CDCEO’22 thus covers advances in both method development and applications in a wide range of related areas, including satellite image processing, super-resolution, gap-filling, high-resolution prediction of spatio-temporal features, and detection of rules underlying the observed state transitions and causal relationships.http://www.iarai.ac.at/cdceo22W41: Semantic Techniques for Narrative-based UnderstandingLise Stork, Katrien Beuls, Luc SteelsThis workshop explores how AI systems can employ narratives in the realization of human-centric AI. Human-centric AI focuses on collaborating with humans, enhancing human capabilities, and empowering humans to better achieve their goals. This requires that we complement the reactive intelligence of today’s neuro-statistical machine learning with deliberative intelligence based on rich models of the problem situation: computational representations of narratives, elaborate ontologies, fine-grained semantic parsing inspired by cognitive linguistics and construction grammar, reasoning and inference, mental simulation, the consultation of semantic resources such as knowledge graphs and episodic memories of past situations, and a control architecture that can flexibly combine all these knowledge sources to arrive at coherent understanding. Besides technical contributions to realize the components needed for understanding, the workshop encourages the presentation of benchmarks as well as demonstrations of AI systems in which narrative-based understanding plays a critical role, such as the decoding and execution of actions needed for everyday activities (e.g. to cook a dish from a recipe), the reconstruction of the temporal and causal relations found in documents (e.g. between historical events leading up to a significant political change), or the formulation of `scientific storylines’ in knowledge discovery that combine information across different scientific papers to generate hypotheses or compare and validate experimental evidence.https://muhai.org/events/196-ijcai-ecai-2022-workshop-semantic-techniques-for-narrative-based-understandingW43: Generalization in PlanningPulkit Verma, Yuqian Jiang, Rushang Karia, Jendrik SeippHumans are good at solving sequential decision making problems, generalizing from a few examples, and learning and expressing generalized knowledge that can help solve new problems. Computing such knowledge remains a long-standing open problem for Artificial Intelligence (AI). Over the last two decades, there has been remarkable progress in the performance of automated planning systems. However, real-world scalability and skill/plan generalization for complex, long-horizon tasks remains an open challenge. This workshop aims to build synergies across different AI communities in order to address all aspects of generalization of solutions for sequential decision making, including, but not limited to, representation of problems and solution concepts that enable efficient generalization and transfer of relevant knowledge, and algorithms for learning or synthesizing such generalized knowledge and solutions. We welcome contributions focusing on different formulations/representations for generalization, empirically validated methods, and theoretical analyses and foundations for generalization.https://aair-lab.github.io/genplan22/W44: Artificial Intelligence for Time Series Analysis: Theory, Algorithms, and ApplicationsDongjin Song, Fenglong Ma, Sanjay Purushotham, Themis Palpanas, Wei Cheng, Yifeng Gao, Yufei HanTime series data are becoming ubiquitous in numerous real-world applications, e.g., IoT devices, healthcare, wearable devices, smart vehicles, financial markets, biological sciences, environmental sciences, etc. Given the availability of massive amounts of data, their complex underlying structures/distributions, together with the high-performance computing platforms, there is a great demand for developing new theories and algorithms to tackle some fundamental challenges (e.g., representation, classification, prediction, causal analysis, etc.) in various types of applications. The goal of this workshop is to provide a platform for researchers and AI practitioners from both academia and industry to discuss potential research directions, key technical issues, and present solutions to tackle related issues in practical applications. The workshop will focus on both the theoretical and practical aspects of time series data analysis and aims to trigger research innovations on theories, algorithms, and applications. We will invite researchers and AI practitioners from the related areas of machine learning, data science, statistics, econometrics, and many others to contribute to this workshop.https://ai4ts.github.io/W45: Interactions between Analogical Reasoning and Machine LearningMiguel Couceiro, Pierre-Alexandre MurenaAnalogical reasoning is a remarkable capability of human reasoning, used to solve hard reasoning tasks. It consists in transferring knowledge from a source domain to a different, but somewhat similar, target domain by relying simultaneously on similarities and dissimilarities. In particular, analogical proportions, i.e. statements of the form “A is to B as C is to D”, are the basis of analogical inference. It contributed to case-based reasoning and to multiple machine learning tasks such as classification, decision making, and automatic translation with competitive results. Moreover, analogical extrapolation can support dataset augmentation (analogical extension) for model learning, especially in environments with few labeled examples. Conversely, advanced neural techniques, such as representation learning, enabled efficient approaches to detecting and solving analogies in domains where symbolic approaches had shown their limits. However, recent approaches using deep learning architectures remain task and domain specific, and strongly rely on ad-hoc representations of objects, i.e. tailor made embeddings. The purpose of this workshop is to bring together AI researchers at the cross roads of machine learning and knowledge representation and reasoning, and interested by the various applications of analogical reasoning in machine learning or, conversely, of machine learning techniques to improve analogical reasoning. The workshop will focus on bridging gaps between multiple communities of AI researchers, including case-based reasoning, deep learning and neuro-symbolic machine learning.https://iarml2022-ijcai-ecai.loria.fr/W48: The 2nd International Workshop on Artificial Intelligence for Autonomous Driving (AI4AD @ IJCAI-ECAI 2022)Jonathan M Francis, Bingqing Chen, Xinshuo Weng, Siddha Ganju, Daniel Omeiza, Hitesh Arora, Eric Nyberg, Jean Oh, Sylvia HerbertWe propose a continuation of “Artificial Intelligence for Autonomous Driving” (AI4AD), as a venue for researchers in artificial intelligence to discuss research problems on autonomous driving (AD), with a specific focus on safe learning. While there have been significant advances in vehicle autonomy (e.g., perception, trajectory forecasting, planning and control, etc.), it is of paramount importance for autonomous systems to adhere to safety specifications, as any safety infraction in urban and highway driving, or high-speed racing could lead to catastrophic failures. We envision the workshop to bring together researchers and industry practitioners from different AI subfields to work towards safer and more robust autonomous technology.https://learn-to-race.org/workshop-ai4ad-ijcai2022/W49: Fourth Workshop on Bridging the Gap Between AI Planning and Reinforcement Learning (PRL)Michael Katz, Hector Palacios, Vicenç GómezWe propose a fourth edition of the PRL workshop series that started at ICAPS 2020. The workshop aims to bridge the gap between the AI Planning and Reinforcement Learning communities, facilitate the discussion of differences and similarities in existing techniques, and encourage collaboration across the fields. In the fourth edition of PRL, at IJCAI, we want to focus on topics relevant to a broader audience than ICAPS. In particular, we will welcome relevant contributions to sequential decision-making beyond existing planning solvers and benchmarks. Meanwhile, ICAPS 2022 has accepted the third edition of PRL. If this proposal for IJCAI is accepted and we have the number of submissions we expect in ICAPS, we might invite some authors to present their work in PRL at IJCAI instead of PRL at ICAPS.https://prl-theworkshop.github.io/prl2022-ijcai/W50: The fifth Data Science Meets Optimization (DSO) WorkshopTias Guns, Michele Lombardi, Neil Yorke-Smith, Yingqian ZhangThis workshop on the close relationship and interplay between data science and optimization continues on the DSO@IJCAI2021, DSO@IJCAI2020, DSO@IJCAI2019, and the DSO@IJCAI-ECAI workshop in 2018. Invited are studies on how techniques from combinatorial optimization and mathematical programming can be enforced by learning from historical data and on how such advanced techniques can contribute to machine learning and data mining. The DSO workshop is closely related to the DSO working group of The Association of European Operational Research Societies (EURO) with yearly streams and workshops at major conferences such as EURO2021 in Athens, IFORS 2021 Virtual, EURO 2018 in Valencia, EURO 2019 in Dublin, IFORS 2017 in Quebec, CPAIOR 2017 in Padua, CEC 2017 in San Sebastian.https://sites.google.com/view/ijcai2022dso/W51: AI for understanding the Ocean and Climate ChangeNayat Sánchez Pi, Pablo Marquet, Luis MartíThe ocean plays a key role in the biosphere, regulating the carbon cycle; absorbing emitted CO2 through the biological pump, and a large part of the heat that the remaining CO2 and other greenhouse gases retained in the atmosphere. Understanding the drivers of micro and macroorganisms in the ocean is of paramount importance to understanding the functioning of ecosystems and the efficiency of the biological pump in sequestering carbon and thus abating climate change. AI, ML, and modeling tools are key to understanding oceans and climate change. In return, these problems also pose important challenges to the current state of the art. Consequently, the topics of interest of this workshop can be grouped into (but not limited to) two sets: a) Advancing the state of the art in areas like AI, ML, and modeling: – handling of graph-based info, – ML for small data: transfer, few-shot, active learning, etc. – causality, interpretability and explainability in AI, – data assimilation and physics-informed neural networks (PINNs), and – develop, calibrate, and validate mechanistic models. b) Answering the questions that emerge from the application domain: – Which are the patterns in plankton taxa and functional diversity? – How these patterns will change under climate change? – How will changes affect the capacity of ocean to sequester CO2 from the atmosphere? – What relations bind communities and local conditions? – What links biodiversity functioning and structure? – How AI can be applied as research support tool to understand planktonic communities? – How new knowledge can be derived from self-supervision, anomaly detection, causal learning, and/or explainable AI? The goal of this workshop is to bring together researchers that are interested and/or applying AI and ML techniques to problems related to marine biology and climate change mitigation. We also expect to attract natural science researchers interested in learning about and applying modern AI and ML methods.https://oceania.inria.cl/#aimocc-2022   ",2022
"
W01: 1st International Workshop on Continual Semi-Supervised LearningAug 19 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Aug 20 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Fabio Cuzzolin, Irina Rish, Kevin Cannons, Vincenzo Lomonaco, Mohamad Asiful Hossain, Salman Khan, Ajmal ShahbazWhereas continual learning has recently attracted much attention in the machine learning community, the focus has been mainly on preventing the model updated in the light of new data from ‘catastrophically forgetting’ its initial knowledge and abilities.

This, however, is in stark contrast with common real-world situations in which an initial model is trained using limited data, only to be later deployed without any additional supervision. In these scenarios the goal is for the model to be incrementally updated using the new (unlabelled) data, in order to adapt to a target domain continually shifting over time.

The aim of this workshop is to formalise this new continual semi-supervised learning (CSSL) paradigm, and to introduce it to the machine learning community in order to mobilise effort in this direction. We present two new benchmark datasets for this problem and propose a number of challenges to the research community.
https://sites.google.com/view/sscl-workshop-ijcai-2021/Watch videoW02: Long-Tailed Distribution Learning (LTDL)Aug 20 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4) Xiu-Shen Wei, Peng Wang,Yu-Feng Li, Rui Xia, Jian YangAs a commonly seen and natural data distribution in various real-world applications, the long-tailed distribution adversely affects the performance of learning-based methods in Artificial Intelligence (AI) at various levels, including the input, intermediate or mid-level stages of the processing or the objectives to be optimized in a multi-task setting, etc. Our Long-Tailed Distribution Learning (LTDL) workshop focuses on the interesting and challenging long-tailed distribution problems in the broad Artificial Intelligence area, which consists of a paper submission session and an invited talk session. Specifically, in the paper submission session, we will peer-review paper submissions involving the LTDL related topics as listed in https://ltdl-ijcai21.github.io/. Moreover, we will invite several domain-specific experts in Computer Vision (CV), Pattern Recognition (PR), Data Mining (DM), and Natural Language Processing (NLP) for sharing their insights and research progress on the topic of LTDL.https://ltdl-ijcai21.github.io/W03: Weakly Supervised Representation Learning WorkshopAug 21 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4)Bo Han, Tongliang Liu, Quanming Yao, Mingming Gong, Chen Gong, Gang Niu, Ivor W. Tsang, Masashi SugiyamaModern machine learning is migrating to the era of complex models (e.g., deep neural networks), which emphasizes the data representation highly. This learning paradigm is known as representation learning. Specifically, via deep neural networks, learned representations often result in much better performance than can be obtained with hand-designed representations. It is noted that representation learning normally requires a plethora of well-annotated data. Giant companies have enough money to collect well-annotated data. Nonetheless, for startups or non-profit organizations, such data is barely acquirable due to the cost of labeling data or the intrinsic scarcity in the given domain. These practical issues motivate us to research and pay attention to weakly supervised representation learning (WSRL), since WSRL does not require such a huge amount of annotated data. We define WSRL as the collection of representation learning problem settings and algorithms that share the same goals as supervised representation learning but can only access to less supervised information than supervised representation learning. In this workshop, we discuss both theoretical and applied aspects of WSRL.https://wsl-workshop.github.io/ijcai21.htmlW04: Artificial Intelligence for EducationAug 20 10:00 – 18:30 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Zitao Liu, Richard Tong, Jiliang Tang, Xiangen Hu, Hang LiRecent years have witnessed growing efforts from AI research community devoted to advancing our education and promising results have been obtained in solving various critical problems in education. However, developing and applying AI technologies to educational practice is fraught with its unique challenges, including, but not limited to, extreme data sparsity, lack of labeled data, and privacy issues. In this workshop, we will focus on introducing research progress on applying AI to education and discussing recent advances of handling challenges encountered in AI educational practice.http://ai4ed.cc/workshops/ijcai2021W05: 3rd Workshop on Financial Technology and Natural Language ProcessingAug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Aug 21 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4)Hsin-His Chen, Hiroya Takamura, Hen-Hsen Huang, Chung-Chi ChenFinTech is an emerging and popular topic in both financial and engineering domains, and the technology of textual information analysis is highly related to the scope of IJCAI. The third workshop on Financial Technology and Natural Language Processing (FinNLP 2021) provides a forum where international participants share knowledge on applying NLP to the FinTech domain. Topics of interest include but not limited to text-based market provisioning, NLP-based investment management, crowdfunding analysis with textual data, text-oriented customer preference analysis, insurance application with textual information, NLP-based know your customer (KYC) approaches, and applications or systems for FinTech with NLP methods. Besides the regular paper submission, two shared-tasks, FinSim-2 and FinSBD-3, are co-located. FinSim-2 focuses on the evaluation of semantic representations by assessing the quality of the automatic classification of a given list of carefully selected terms from the Financial domain against a domain ontology. FinSBD-3 aims to extract sentences, lists, and list items from financial documents. The Proceedings of FinNLP-2021 will be  published at ACL Anthology.https://sites.google.com/nlg.csie.ntu.edu.tw/finnlp2021/W06: Reinforcement Learning for Intelligent Transportation Systems WorkshopAug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Aug 21 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4)Zhiwei (Tony) Qin, Liam Paull, Rui Song, Hongtu ZhuRL for ITS is an emerging interdisciplinary area that is undergoing rapid development and still require further understanding on a number of issues, e.g., dynamic environments, run-time performance, and safe deployment.

The main goal of this workshop is to bring together researchers and practitioners from both the RL and transportation communities to answer the following questions:

• What are the recent advances in the state-of-the-art of RL for ITS?
• What are the new application areas in transportation that can be  benefited by RL?
• What are the successful stories in real-world applications of RL to ITS?
• What are the challenges and critical issues that may have significant impact on a successful application?

Answering these questions is critical to unleash the potential of the core intelligence in ITS beyond classical machine learning.  We hope the participants will leave the workshop with a better idea about the current status of RL for ITS, about what is working well and what is not, thus providing guidance on directions of future research in this exciting area.
https://rl4its-ijcai21.github.io/workshop/W07: IJCAI-21 Workshop on Applied Semantics Extraction and Analytics (ASEA)Aug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Kamalakar Karlapalem, Craig Knoblock, Mausam, Sameena ShahSemantics has a vital role in an AI system. In building AI systems for real-world applications, semantics are often extracted from the data and managed through knowledge bases. The problems are determining what these semantics are, how to extract the relevant semantics, which representation format to use, and applying these semantics to run an AI system. Although there is research in extracting semantics from databases, tables, documents, images, videos, and even multi-modal data, the work has often been conducted in independent research silos without emphasizing the overarching focus on semantics and AI systems.

This workshop aims to bring together researchers working on various streams related to semantics to study and develop the broader research area of semantics extraction and analytics and their applications. The workshop’s program will include invited talks, spotlight paper presentations, and lightning poster presentations to showcase research opportunities, novel solutions and systems, success stories, and future directions.https://asea2021.github.io/ijcai-asea2021/W08: 9th Workshop “What can FCA do for Artificial Intelligence”Aug 21 7:00 – 13:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Sergei O. Kuznetsov, Amedeo Napoli, Sebastian RudolphThis Ninth edition of the FCA4AI workshop (http://www.fca4ai.hse.ru/2021/) will be co-located with the IJCAI 2021 Conference to be held in Montréal, 21st-26th August, 2021. The objective of the FCA4AI workshop is to foster the interactions between AI and Formal Concept Analysis (FCA). Actually FCA is a mathematically well-founded theory aimed at classification and knowledge discovery that can be used for many purposes in AI. The preceding editions of the workshop have shown that many interactions and bridges exist between AI and FCA researchers.
Accordingly, the objective of the 9th FCA4AI workshop is to investigate important issues, e.g. (i) how can FCA support various AI activities such as knowledge discovery, knowledge engineering, machine learning, data mining, information retrieval, recommendation…, (ii) how can FCA be extended in order to help AI researchers to solve new and complex problems in their domains, e.g. hybrid knowledge discovery, and how FCA can play a role in current trends such as explainable AI, assessing fairness of algorithms in decision making, and study of causality, among others.
https://fca4ai.hse.ru/2021/W09: AI for Sports Analytics (AISA)Aug 17 8:00 – 14:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Shayegan Omidshafiei, Karl Tuyls, Jesse Davis, Jan Van Haaren, Ian Graham, Jackson Broshear, Daniel Hennes, Jerome Connor, Zhe Wang, Adria Recasens, Romuald Elie, Praneet DuttaThe past decade has seen a tremendous growth of interest in sports analytics, not only from an economic and commercial perspective, but also from a purely scientific one. In fact, there has been a growing number of papers published at top artificial intelligence (AI) and machine learning venues that revolve around problems in sports, as well as multiple scientific events organized on the topic. Similar to other downstream domains that have benefited from advances of AI and machine learning, this growth in interest is due to important technological improvements in data collection and processing capabilities, progress in statistical learning and in particular deep learning, increased computational resources, and ever-growing economic activities associated with sports and culture (e.g., emergent consultancy ventures revolving around sports data collection and statistics).

The purpose of this workshop is to bring together AI researchers, sports data scientists, and other stakeholders who are interested in the intersection of AI and sports. In particular, we are interested in attracting work that focuses on the overlap of multiple areas of AI such as machine learning, game theory, and computer vision and their application to the sports analytics domain. We also plan to have a strong list of invited speakers, participant interaction, and panel discussions.https://sites.google.com/corp/view/ijcai-aisa-2021/W10: 7th International Workshop on Mining Actionable Insights from Social Networks, Special Edition on Responsible Social Media Mining (MAISoN’21)Aug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Aug 21 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4)Eduardo Hargreaves, Huan Liu, Cristina Miguel, Zeinab NoorianThe wide adoption of social media presents an interesting opportunity for performing data mining and knowledge discovery in a real-world context. However, the observations and research findings made with social media data can only provide unprecedented insights into human behavior if social data provides a representative description of human activity. Recent empirical evidence on US 2016 election or 2016 Brexit prediction outcomes has warned against biases and inaccuracies occurring not only at the source of the data and during the processing but also under the influence of those that design, build, maintain or use the analytical models, embedding and amplifying their biases. The recognition of different sorts of biases in the data analytics pipeline and their consequences open new research venues related to bot detection, neutralizing content pollution, noise removal from social media data, needs for innovative evaluation methods as well as ethical boundaries around the use of social data. The goal of this workshop is to contribute a practical perspective to the body of research that aims to quantify biases, to devise better methods for prototypical processing pipeline for social data, to evaluate such methods in context and to develop actionable frameworks on different dimensions of responsible social analytics aiming to mitigate the potential issues associated with many sorts of biases.https://www.maison-workshop.com/W11: International Workshop on Artificial Intelligence for Social Good (AI4SG)Aug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Aug 21 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4)Amulya Yadav, Haipeng Chen, Sasha Luccioni, Thanh Hong NguyenThis workshop will explore how AI research can contribute to solving challenging problems faced by current-day societies. For example, what role can AI research play in promoting health, sustainable development and infrastructure security? How can AI initiatives be used to achieve consensus among a set of negotiating self-interested entities (e.g., finding resolutions to trade talks between countries)? To address such questions, this workshop will bring together researchers and practitioners across different strands of AI research and a wide range of important real-world application domains. The objective is to share the current state of research and practice, explore directions for future work, and create opportunities for collaboration. In addition, the workshop will place a special emphasis on highlighting AI approaches for tackling the COVID-19 pandemic.https://amulyayadav.github.io/AI4SG2021/W12: 7th Linguistic and Cognitive Approaches to Dialog Agents (LaCATODA 2021)Aug 20 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4) Rafal Rzepka, Jordi Vallverdú, Andre Wlodarczyk, Michal Ptaszynski, Pawel DybalaCreating human-like dialog systems have been for decades one of the main goals of AI, but we are still far from achieving this goal for many reasons. LaCATODA series brings together researchers and entrepreneurs working on various facets of understanding, inviting not only computer scientists and engineers but also researchers working on cognition and language to present their work (including work in progress and position papers). Except traditional dialog processing we are interested in common sense knowledge and reasoning, emotions, moral aspects (like detecting hate speech or biases), etc. We are looking forward to discussing social, psychological and philosophical aspects of dialog systems, their problems and ideas for solving these problems. For that reason, also papers analyzing existing systems and describing their shortcomings are welcome.http://arakilab.media.eng.hokudai.ac.jp/IJCAI2021/LaCATODA2021/About.htmlW13: Generalization in PlanningAug 19 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Javier Segovia-Aguas, Siddharth Srivastava, Guillem Francès, Blai BonetHumans are good at solving sequential decision-making problems, generalizing from few examples, and learning skills that can be transferred to the solution of unseen problems. These problems remain long standing open problems for Artificial Intelligence (AI). Over the last two decades, there has been remarkable progress in the performance of automated planning systems to solve decision making problems by including novel search techniques and heuristics. However, real-world scalability and skill/plan generalization for complex, long-horizon tasks still remains an open challenge for current AI algorithms.

This workshop aims to build synergies across different AI communities in order to address all aspects of generalization of solutions for sequential decision making including, but not limited to, representation of problems and solution concepts that enable efficient generalization and transfer of relevant knowledge, and algorithms for learning or synthesizing such generalized knowledge and solutions. We welcome contributions focusing on different formulations/representations for generalization, empirically validated methods, and theoretical analyses and foundations for generalization.https://sites.google.com/view/genplan21W14: AIMA4Edu: AI-based Multimodal Analytics for Understanding Human Learning in Real-World Educational ContextsAug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Richard Tong, Edgar Kalns, Yiqiang Chen, Feiyue WangHuman learning is a complex interactive and iterative process that takes place at a very fine-grained level. However, our ability to understand and support this fascinating latent learning process is often limited by what we can perceive and how we can measure. Recent advances in sensing technology and accompanying techniques for processing multimodal data give us a new opportunity to look at this classical problem with a new pair of lenses. We are particularly interested in those data gathered from the real-world educational activities versus those from the controlled lab environment.

In this 3rd annual convening of the AIMA4EDU workshop, we expand topic areas to include nascent methodological areas and work beginning to apply multimodal data and AI to support learners. We will continue to explore cross-field experience from healthcare, HCI, neural science, etc. A multimodal dataset collected by Squirrel AI Learning is published on the workshop’s website, and we also encourage attendants to share more data to the community for research purposes only.
https://www.aima4edu.com/W15: AI and Product DesignAug 19 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Oliver Niggemann, Frank Mantwill, Cesare Fantuzzi, Alexander Feldman, Johan de KleerDesigns have to fulfill several, often contradicting requirements: First, a product must take technical considerations such as production constraints, costs, physical properties and material characteristics and availability into consideration. Second, aspects such as creativity, novelty and user acceptance play a crucial role. The resolution of contradictions is accompanied by a high degree of uncertainty, which results from different unknown dependencies and probabilities.

Artificial Intelligence (AI) has the potential to contribute to these challenges. Current advances in AI such as deep learning or symbolic-neuronal architectures have the potential to support the design engineer in the entire product development process. The utilization of AI methods can not only help relieving design engineers from tedious work in routine design, it can also lay the foundation for innovative or creative design, as well as significantly shorten development times. Furthermore, existing information and historical data from previous design projects represent a possible potential for future smart assistance systems.
https://www.hsu-hh.de/imb/en/ijcai-2021-workshop-ai-and-product-designW16: Artificial Intelligence for Autonomous DrivingAug 20 10:50 – 15:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Aug 20 16:00 – 21:40 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Xinshuo Weng, Ye Yuan, Daniel Omeiza, Shangxuan Wu, Kris KitaniAutonomous driving provides a rich source of high-impact research problems for the broad artificial intelligence community across different fields such as computer vision, machine learning, robotics, language and speech, civil engineering, human-computer interaction, environmental science, and neuroscience. Further, full self-driving capability (“Level 5”) is far from solved and extremely complex, beyond the capability of any one institution or company, necessitating larger-scale communication and collaboration between researchers in different fields. Beyond the research community, autonomous driving research also has significant social impacts such as reducing road accidents; giving independence to those unable to drive; reducing emissions to protect the environment and alleviate climate change; reducing traffic congestion, and improving the efficiency of urban transportation. The goal of this workshop is to embrace interdisciplinary knowledge in different fields of AI, from both academia and industry, to discuss how different fields can contribute to self-driving technology altogether and increase its social impact. This will be the 1st IJCAI workshop in this series.https://www.ai4ad.net/W17: Robust and Reliable Autonomy in the Wild (R2AW)Aug 19 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Nick Hawes, Ece Kamar, Bruno Lacerda, Sandhya Saisubramanian, Shlomo ZilbersteinThe rapid development and deployment of autonomous systems in the open world has highlighted the need for advances in the theory and practice of robust and reliable AI.  Autonomous cars, drone delivery services, health care robots, and emergency response systems are examples in which system decisions directly impact human lives.  This workshop aims to bring together researchers from academia and industry to discuss the challenges involved in deployed autonomous systems, particularly systems that operate in the presence of minor perturbations or noise in the environment, and under model imprecision and uncertainty. The workshop will offer a forum for researchers to discuss progress and knowledge gaps in robust and reliable decision making, drawing on a wide range of methods, including automated planning, reinforcement learning, decision-theory, formal verification, multi-agent systems, game theory, robotics, AI ethics, and human-centered AI.  We welcome the participation of researchers from different disciplines representing different perspectives on the topic.http://rbr.cs.umass.edu/r2aw/W18: 3rd International Workshop on Deep Learning for Human Activity RecognitionAug 19 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4)  Zhenghua Chen, Wu Min, Jianfei Yang, Xiaoli LiHuman activity recognition (HAR) can be used for a number of applications, such as health-care services and smart home applications. Recently, deep learning has achieved great success in many challenging research areas, such as image recognition and natural language processing. The key merit of deep learning is to automatically learn representative features from massive data. This technology can be a good candidate for human activity recognition. Some initial attempts can be found in the literature. However, many challenging research problems in terms of accuracy, device heterogeneous, environment changes, etc. remain unsolved. This workshop intends to prompt state-of-the-art approaches on deep learning for human activity recognition.https://keyplay.github.io/ijcai2021_workshop/W19: Is Neuro-Symbolic SOTA still a myth for Natural Language Inference?Aug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Aug 21 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4)Somak Aditya, Maria D. Chang, Swarat Chaudhuri, Monojit Choudhury, Sebastijan DumančićThe Natural Language Inferencing (NLI) task has been central to track progress towards understanding natural language. Current state-of-the-art Deep Learning-based NLI methods achieve very high accuracy, but have been shown to generalize poorly, often in simpler examples — indicating lack of reasoning capabilities. On the other hand, neuro-symbolic methods can do robust reasoning, but extensions of such methods are hard for tasks with a large range of linguistic variability. Slightly independently, the deep learning community has made progress towards Automated Theorem Proving and Program Synthesis, which are also relevant to NLI. Hence, to solve this “paradox of choice”, we revisit the potential and practicality of Neuro-symbolic methods for the NLI task. We want to take specific reasoning dimensions, informed by Logic, Knowledge Representation and Reasoning, and Linguistics literature; and track the progress of both Neural and Neuro-Symbolic efforts. We also aim to bring together researchers from Deep Learning, Natural Language Processing, Symbolic Logic, and Program Synthesis in the same platform.https://nsnli.github.io/W20: Artificial Intelligence for Anomalies and Novelties (AI4AN)Aug 20 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4) Aug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Guansong Pang, Jundong Li, Anton van den Hengel, Longbing Cao, Thomas G. DietterichAnomalies are referred to as observations or events that are rare or significantly different from the majority of observations we have in hand, while novelties are observations from novel classes that were unseen during learning. Recognition, detection and accommodation to anomalies and novelties are active research areas in multiple communities, including data mining, machine learning, and computer vision. The successful early detection of anomalies and novelties is of great significance across many domains. Specialized techniques have been studied in some of these areas for decades, but recent developments are raising a wide variety of new research questions and challenges in deep anomaly detection, fundamental theories of novelty and abnormality, characterization and accommodation of anomalies, etc. This workshop will gather researchers and practitioners from diverse communities and knowledge background to promote the development of fundamental theories, effective algorithms, and novel applications of anomaly and novelty detection, characterization, and adaptation.https://sites.google.com/view/ai4an2021/Watch videoW21: AIofAI: 1st Workshop on Adverse Impacts and Collateral Effects of Artificial Intelligence TechnologiesAug 19 10:00 – 17:30 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Esma Aïmeur, Nicolas Diaz Ferreyra, Hicham HageThe role of Artificial Intelligence (AI) in people’s everyday life has grown exponentially over the last decade. Currently, individuals rely heavily on intelligent software applications across different domains including healthcare, logistics, defense, and governance. Particularly, AI systems facilitate decision-making processes across these domains through the automatic analysis and classification of large data sets and the subsequent identification of relevant patterns. To a large extent, such an approach has contributed to the sustainable development of modern societies and remains a powerful instrument for social and economic growth. However, recent events related to the massive spread of misinformation and deepfakes, along with large privacy and security breaches, have raised concerns among AI practitioners and researchers about the negative and detrimental impacts of these technologies. Hence, there is an urgent call for guidelines, methods, and techniques to assess and mitigate the potentially adverse impacts and side effects of AI applications. This workshop explores how and up to which extent AI technologies can serve deceptive and malicious purposes either intentionally or not. Furthermore, it seeks to elaborate on countermeasures and mitigation actions to prevent potential negative effects and collateral damages of AI systems.https://sites.google.com/view/aiofai2021/homeW22: International Workshop on Federated and Transfer Learning for Data Sparsity and ConfidentialityAug 20 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4) Lixin Fan, Heng Huang, Sinno Jialin Pan, Han Yu, Wei-Wei Tu, Yang LiuPrivacy and security are becoming a key concern in our digital age. Increasingly strict data privacy regulations such as the European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) bring new legislative challenges to the big data and artificial intelligence (AI) community. Many operations in the big data domain, such as merging user data from various sources for building an AI model, will be considered illegal under the new regulatory framework if performed without explicit user authorization. To explore how the AI research community can adapt to this new regulatory reality, we organize this one-day workshop. The workshop will focus on technical issues including but not limit to data collection, integration, training, sparsity and modelling, both in the centralized and distributed setting. It intends to provide a forum to discuss the open problems and share the most recent and ground-breaking work on the study and application of privacy-preserving machine learning, while dealing with sparse data.http://federated-learning.org/fl-ijcai-2021/W23: 9th AI4KM invites the 1st AIES 2021 (Artificial Intelligence for Energy and Sustainability)Aug 19 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Aug 20 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Gülgün Kayakutlu, Eunika Mercier-Laurent, Mieczyslaw Owoc, Georgios Saharidis, Jean-François RizandThis workshop has the specific objective of facing environmental challenges using AI approaches and techniques to support and improve the management of sustainable energy systems within smart cities, smart facilities, smart buildings, smart transportation and smart houses.

Decision support systems, planning and optimization in the sustainability and energy management fields require understanding of related systems, modelling, applying appropriate AI techniques including machine learning algorithms and handling temporary aspects of big data. Energy generation, transmission, distribution, sales and consumption need distinct focus with the energy mix optimization, distributed approaches, renewable energies with storage. Any short-term, mid-term and long-term forecasting, optimization models, trend foresights and prescriptions based on scenarios are studied in the energy world and the smart systems for sustainability.

The objective of this multidisciplinary session is to bring both researchers and practitioners together to discuss methodological, technical and organizational aspects of AI used for the traditional and renewable energy lifecycles. Knowledge sharing in constructing the AI models, Business Operations, Support of short, medium and long-term decisions and innovations in the fields of sustainability and energy will improve the interactions of human life and economies. Ultimate goal of the workshop is bring a contribution to achieve some of 17 UN sustainability goals.http://ifipgroup.com/wp-content/uploads/2021/03/AIES_2021-Workshop_20210320.pdfW24: 1st International Workshop on Adaptive Cyber Defense (ACD 2021)Aug 19 10:00 – 13:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Aug 20 10:00 – 13:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Damian Marriott, Kimberly Ferguson-Walter, Sunny Fugate, Marco CarvalhoAdaptive Cyber Defense Workshop – The cyber domain cannot currently be reliably and effectively defended without extensive reliance on human experts. While AI and ML solutions for detecting malicious activity are on the rise, skilled cyber defenders are in short supply and often cannot respond fast enough to mitigate the detected cyber threats.  With the growing adoption of AI and ML techniques to both cyber and non-cyber settings, there is an increasing need to bridge the critical gap between AI and Cyber researchers and practitioners.  We must accelerate our efforts to create autonomous and semi-autonomous cyber defenses that can learn to recognize and respond to cyber attacks or discover and mitigate weaknesses in cooperation with other cyber operation systems and human experts. Furthermore, these defenses must be adaptive, and able to evolve over time to take into account changes in attacker behavior, benign changes in the systems, and expected drift in user behavior.https://acd-2021.org/Watch videoW25: Toward Intellectual Property Protection on Deep Learning as a ServicesAug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Chee Seng Chan, Lixin Fan, Qiang YangMachine learning techniques, especially deep learning (DL) techniques, have made significant technological break-throughs in recent years and are widely applied in many fields, such as image classification, object detection, voice recognition, natural language processing, self-driving cars, smart healthcare, etc.

Trained DL models are of high value and must be considered intellectual property of the legitimate owner, i.e. the party that created it. The value of DL models lies in the effort and resources allocated in the process of training data collection, cleansing, pre-processing, organizing, storing, and in certain cases even manual labelling, which is often time-consuming and expensive.

Therefore, there is an urgent need to protect deep learning (DL) models from being illegally copied, redistributed, or abused without respecting the intellectual properties of legitimate owners. This workshop is intended to be posi-tioned at the frontier of IPR protection research and showcase the most excellent and advanced work underway at academic and private research organizations as well as government labs.
http://federated-learning.org/DeepIPR-IJCAI-2021W26: ’D*** it… I’m an engineer, not a doctor!’ : AI for Spacecraft LongevityAug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Nikola Simidjievski, Dragi Kocev, Luke Lucas, Ljupčo TodorovskiSpacecraft operation challenges concern remote spacecraft, operating under limited computational constraints in harsh environments, equipped with decaying batteries and components (e.g., processors and memory) lagging decades behind the current technology. They relate to tasks such as autonomous spacecraft route planning, optimal spacecraft operations (forecasting and decision making), anomaly detection and diagnosis, mission planning as well as analysis of the spacecraft configuration flow.  More importantly, they are associated with high-cost of failure, where repairs are impossible, diagnosis limited and emergency reaction-times long and unpredictable.

There is great potential for state-of-the-art AI to address these operation challenges, particularly related to spacecraft longevity and endurance. The goal of this workshop is to bring attention to these challenges and offer a platform for discussing efforts and solutions from different communities across the different AI disciplines. More importantly, it will highlight the overarching goals of analysing large volumes of spacecraft telemetry data as well as designing, developing and deploying methods that operate on limited-capacity hardware in high-radiation environments.
https://ai4spacecraft.github.ioW27: The Workshop on Competitive and Cooperative Social Interactions: From HRI to Machine Learning and Back AgainAug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Aug 21 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4)Pablo Barros,  Francisco Cruz, German Parisi, Doreen JirakIn this workshop, we put together the top-tier researchers on machine learning, in particular social signal processing, and human-robot interaction to discuss, understand and propose possible solutions for our overall topic “Competition and Cooperation: How to integrate machine learning and human-robot interaction in meaningful applications?”. Our intention is to leverage an enriching discussion of the existing problems on competitive and cooperative interactions on the multidisciplinary view of our contributors, and not to present individual solutions for each of the related topics. Our invited speakers, all experts in their respective areas, will discuss the open problems involving social agents’ interactions within their specialty. We also invite the submissions of position papers that present a critical view on this topic to complement and widen our discussions.https://www.whisperproject.eu/compcoopW28: 2nd International Workshop on Deceptive AIAug 19 3:00 – 7:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Aug 19 9:00 – 13:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Peta Masters, Stefan Sarkadi, Ben Wright, Peter McBurney, Iyad Rahwan, Liz SonenburgThere is no dominant theory of deception. The literature on deception treats different aspects and components of deception separately, offering contradictory evidence and conflicting opinions. Emerging AI techniques offer a unique opportunity to expand our understanding of the topic from a computational perspective. However, the design, modelling and engineering of deceptive machines is not trivial from either conceptual, engineering, scientific, or ethical perspectives. DeceptAI brings together people from academia, industry and policy-making to discuss not only the practical and theoretical challenges but also the benefits, risks and potential threats of developing deceptive AI systems. This workshop takes a multidisciplinary (Computer Science, Psychology, Sociology, Philosophy & Ethics, Military Studies, Law etc.) approach to the debate, aiming to shed light on aspects of deceptive AI ranging from behaviour, reasoning and cognition through ethical and societal impact to engineering and deployment.https://sites.google.com/view/deceptai2021W29: Semantic Data Mining (SEDAMI)Aug 20 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Martin Atzmueller, Grzegorz J. Nalepa, Szymon Bobek, Nada LavracThe general goal of data mining is to uncover novel, interesting, and ultimately understandable patterns, cf. (Fayyad et al. 1996), i.e., relating to valuable, useful and implicit knowledge. Recent advances of data mining and machine learning apparently bring new challenges in its practical use, including interpretability, introduction and preservation of knowledge, as well as the provisioning of explanations. Using semantic information such as domain/background knowledge is a promising emerging direction for addressing these problems, where the knowledge is typically represented in a knowledge repository, such as an ontology, or a knowledge base.

With this workshop we aim to get an insight into the current status of research in semantic data mining. The main aspect of semantic data mining, which we focus on in this workshop, is the explicit integration of semantic information and domain knowledge into data mining and machine learning, where the algorithms for data mining/modeling or post-processing make use of the formalized knowledge to improve the results. We encourage contributions on methods, techniques and applications that are both domain-specific but also transversal to different application domains. In particular, we solicit contributions that aim to focus on semantic data mining for providing and/or enhancing interpretability, the introduction and preservation of knowledge, as well as the provisioning of explanations.https://sedami.geist.reW30: 34th International Workshop on Qualitative ReasoningAug 19 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Núria Agell, Anthony Cohn, Johan de Kleer, Zoe Falomir, Kenneth D. Forbus, Lledó Museros, Diedrich WolterThe Qualitative Reasoning (QR) community develops qualitative representations and reasoning algorithms to understand the world from incomplete, imprecise, or uncertain data. Qualitative models span natural systems (e.g., physics, biology, ecology, geology), social systems (e.g., economics, cultural decision-making), cognitive systems (e.g., conceptual learning, spatial reasoning, intelligent tutors, robotics), and more.  QR research includes:

• Developing new formalisms and algorithms for qualitative reasoning.
• Building and evaluating qualitative models in novel domains for prediction, diagnosis, explanation, and other reasoning tasks.
• Characterizing how humans learn and reason qualitatively about the continuous world with incomplete knowledge.
• Developing novel representations to describe time, space, change, uncertainty, causality, and continuity.
QR2021 provides a forum to share progress toward these goals. Given the lack of travel costs, we hope that this makes the workshop more accessible to those who are interested in QR but might not have been able to participate previously.https://www.qrg.northwestern.edu/qr2021/Watch videoW31: 2nd Workshop on Artificial Intelligence for Function, Disability, and HealthAug 20 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Aug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Denis Newman-Griffis, Bart Desmet, Ayah Zirikly, Suzanne Tamang, Hongfang LiuThe Second Workshop on Artificial Intelligence for Function, Disability, and Health (AI4Function 2021) invites the submission of abstracts and original research papers focused on applying informatics methods, artificial intelligence (AI) or data mining techniques in the area of whole-person care, disability, and functional status information.  AI4Function is a venue for researchers cutting across data science and AI methods to discuss new ways to collect and utilize functional status information within healthcare delivery, public health, and social well-being.  The first AI4Function workshop brought together researchers from fields as diverse as natural language processing, in-home sensing, psychometrics, and health policy, and we aim to continue this multidisciplinary exchange in the second iteration of the workshop.  For the full Call for Papers and more information on the workshop, see https://ai4function.github.io/2021.https://ai4function.github.io/2021/Watch videoW32: MRC-HCCS – Human-Centric and Contextual Systems, 13th International Workshop Modelling | Reasoning | Context Aug 19 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Aug 20 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Jörg Cassens, Rebekah Wegener, Anders Kofod-PetersenContext is a central topic in Artificial Intelligence, essential for understanding causation and crucial for sub fields like explainable AI and ambient intelligence. It is critical for human-centred and ethical, sustainable approaches. Context is fundamental for personalisation and the development of situated & contextual AI.

Context is also central in Human-Computer Interaction, essential for usability of and user experience with interac-tive systems and crucial in specialised fields, such as affective computing and social robotics.

Context is inherently an interdisciplinary topic that has clear relations to linguistics, semiotics, cognitive science, mathematics, and philosophy as well as other areas such as sociology and anthropology.

MRC is a bridge between diverse communities and serves as a means for integrating models and findings from dif-ferent areas. We invite contributions from other fields of study in order to further trans- and interdisciplinary ap-proaches and further the integration of discipline specific knowledge into AI research.http://mrc.kriwi.de/hccs2021/W33: 4th Workshop on AI for Aging, Rehabilitation and Intelligent Assisted Living (ARIAL)Aug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Shehroz Khan, Alex Mihailidis, Amir AhmadAccording to a WHO report, the number of people in the world aged 60 or over is projected to grow to 2.1 billion by the year 2050. Aging can come with various complexities and challenges, e.g., decline in physical and cognitive health. These changes affect a person’s everyday life, resulting in decreased social participation, lack of physical activity, and vulnerability to injury and disability, that can be exacerbated by the occurrence of various acute health events, such strokes, or long term illnesses. Leveraging AI and novel machine learning models is essential to make advancements in the field of aging and technology. Building AI models on health data will facilitate independent assisted living, promote healthy and active lifestyle, and manage rehabilitation routines effectively. With this workshop, we will bring together interdisciplinary researchers from different sub-fields of AI, in general, machine learning and deep learning to identify and approach the ARIAL-related problems.https://sites.google.com/view/arial2021/homeWatch videoW34: Deep Learning, Case-Based Reasoning, and AutoML: Present and Future SynergiesAug 20 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)David W. Aha, David Crandall, David LeakeDeep learning (DL) research has made dramatic progress in recent years, achieving high performance on supervised learning tasks for numerous problem domains.  Simultaneously, there remain well-known challenges such as the need for large amounts of labeled training data, solving synthesis problems with structured solutions (e.g., designs, plans, or schedules), and explainability. Case-based reasoning is a knowledge-based methodology for reasoning from prior episodes, with complementary capabilities—such as to solve problems with small data sets or those requiring structured solutions, and to generate concrete explanations—and limitations. AutoML concerns processes for automatically generating end-to-end-machine learning pipelines, which could employ DL techniques and be built from prior cases (of successful pipeline components). This workshop will bring together researchers interested in DL, CBR, and AutoML to identify new opportunities and beneficial strategies for integrating these approaches to address current challenges.http://vision.soic.indiana.edu/deepcbr-2021/W35: 2021 International Workshop on Safety & Security of Deep LearningAug 19 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Aug 19 20:00 – 2:00 (Next day) Montreal Time (UTC-4)  Yuanfang Guo, Bo Li, Xianglong Liu, Jiantao ZhouDeep learning, which is the current representative technology in artificial intelligence, has demonstrated tremendous success in various tasks, such as computer vision, natural language processing, data mining, etc. Unfortunately, deep learning models have also encountered critical safety and security threats in recent years. Due to its implicit vulnerability, deep learning models can be easily affected by the adversarial perturbations and perform abnormally, which may yield serious consequences in certain applications such as autonomous driving, etc. Meanwhile, deep learning models may also be utilized by the malicious attackers to generate forged multimedia content, such as fake images/videos, to deceive people, which may induce trust issues among different people and organizations.
In this workshop, we aim to bring more attentions from the researchers in the fields of adversarial attack & defense, forensics, robust deep learning, explainable deep learning, etc., to discuss the recent progresses and future directions for tackling the various safety and security issues of deep learning models.
https://ssdl2021.github.io/W36: Workshop on Artificial Intelligence Safety (AISafety)Aug 19 8:00 – 14:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Aug 20 8:00 – 14:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Huáscar Espinoza, José Hernández-Orallo, Xiaowei Huang, Cynthia Chen, Gabriel Perdroza, Mauricio Castillo-Effen, John McDermid, Seán Ó hÉigeartaigh, Richard MallahIn the last decade, there has been a growing concern on risks of AI. Safety is becoming increasingly relevant as humans are progressively ruled out from the decision/control loop of intelligent, and learning-enabled machines. In particular, the technical foundations and assumptions on which traditional safety engineering principles are based, are inadequate for systems in which AI algorithms, in particular Machine Learning (ML) algorithms, are interacting with the physical world at increasingly higher levels of autonomy. We must also consider the connection between the safety challenges posed by present-day AI systems, and more forward-looking research focused on more capable future AI systems, up to and including Artificial General Intelligence (AGI). The AISafety workshop seeks a new perspective of system engineering where multiple disciplines such as AI and safety engineering are viewed as a larger whole, while considering ethical and legal issues, in order to build trustable intelligent autonomy.https://www.aisafetyw.org/W37: Continual and Multimodal Learning for Internet of ThingsAug 21 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Tong Yu, Susu Xu, Handong Zhao, Ruiyi Zhang, Shijia PanInternet of Things (IoT) provides streaming, large-amount, and multimodal sensing data over time. The statistical properties of these data are often significantly different by sensing modalities and temporal traits, which are hardly captured by conventional learning methods. Continual and multimodal learning allows integration, adaptation and generalization of the knowledge learnt from previous experiential data collected with heterogeneity to new situations. Therefore, continual and multimodal learning is an important step to improve the estimation, utilization, and security of real-world data from IoT devices. This workshop aims to explore the intersection and combination of continual machine learning and multimodal modeling with applications in Internet of Things. The workshop welcomes the works addressing these issues in different applications and domains, such as natural language processing, computer vision, human-centric sensing, smart cities, health, etc. We aim at bringing together researchers from different areas to establish a multidisciplinary community and share the latest research.https://cmliot2021.github.io/W38: Data Science Meets Optimization (DSO)Aug 19 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4) Aug 20 10:00 – 16:00 Montreal Time (UTC-4)Patrick De Causmaecker, Tias Guns, Michele Lombardi, Yingqian ZhangThis workshop on the close relationship and interplay between data science and optimization continues on the DSO@IJCAI2020, DSO@IJCAI2019, and the DSO@IJCAI-ECAI workshop in 2018. Invited are studies on how techniques from combinatorial optimization and mathematical programming can be enforced by learning from historical data and on how such advanced techniques can contribute to machine learning and data mining. The DSO workshop is closely related to the DSO working group of The Association of European Operational Research Societies (EURO) with yearly streams and workshops at major conferences such as EURO2021 in Athens, IFORS 2021 Virtual, EURO 2018 in Valencia, EURO 2019 in Dublin, IFORS 2017 in Quebec, CPAIOR 2017 in Padua, CEC 2017 in San Sebastian.https://sites.google.com/view/ijcai2021dsoWatch video

",2021
"




Workshops




IDSessionsWorkshop NameDescriptionVideo




W01Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JSTPrinciple and Practice of Data and Knowledge Acquisition Workshop (PKAW2020)Series of PKAW (Principle and Practice of Data and Knowledge Acquisition Workshop) workshop has long been an integral part of PRICAI over nearly two decades.The purpose of this workshop is to provide a place for intensive discussion on all aspects of knowledge acquisition. Multidisciplinary approach for knowledge acquisition is the topic of interests that includes data driven approach based on machine learning etc. as well as those to make human experts’ implicit knowledge machine executable. In this respect, PKAW2020 calls for a wide range of research papers concerning knowledge acquisition. We also invite submissions concerning data acquisition and representation. All the accepted papers are published as the post proceedings of Lecture Notes in Computer Science by Springer. PKAW2020 is sponsored by SIG-KBS, a special interest group of Knowledge Based System of The Japanese Society of Artificial Intelligence.


W02Jan 7, 5pm – 10pm JST Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JST8th Artificial Intelligence for Knowledge Management (AI4KM)The objective of this multidisciplinary session is to gather both researchers and practitioners to discuss experiences in various AI approaches and techniques applied to knowledge management and innovation. It includes methodological, technical and organizational aspects of AI used for knowledge management and feedback from KM applications using AI. Among the topics to address are: knowledge management methods, models, decision support systems, management advisors, virtual training, serious games, applications of machine learning to support innovation and eco-innovation, knowledge visualization for improving the creativity and human-machine interfaces, image mining making links between data and images ex bio-detection are good examples of multidisciplinary applications as well as knowledge management applied to global security and sustainability.


W03Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JSTDisease Computational ModelingMany common chronic diseases remain mysterious as to how they manifest themselves and how they progress. The Disease Computational Modeling (DCM) workshop aims at providing a research forum where AI based computational methods are presented and discussed to further our understanding of how diseases develop over time. This calls for methods that can discover biological association for disease genotyping; clinical representation for disease phenotyping; probabilistic graph models for disease progression; disease-symptom models for screening or early diagnosis; disease-drug models for optimal care patterns; embedding of medical concepts w./w.o. patient visits; or other novel disease computational models with the potential if injecting meaningful insights in healthcare.


W04Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JST5th International Workshop on Biomedical Informatics with Optimization and Machine learning (BOOM 2020)The BOOM workshop aims at catalyzing synergies among biomedical informatics, artificial intelligence, machine learning, and optimization. This workshop is targeting an audience of applied mathematicians, computer scientists, industrial engineers, bioinformaticians, computational biologists, clinicians, and healthcare researchers who are interested in exploring the emerging and fascinating interdisciplinary topics.


W05Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JST1st Workshop on Artificial Intelligence for Function, Disability, and Health (AI4Function)The First Workshop on Artificial Intelligence for Function, Disability, and Health (AI4Function 2020) addresses the role of Artificial Intelligence (AI) technologies in collecting and analyzing information on function and disability. Function, as the lived experience of health, describes physical and mental wellness at the whole-person level, and is a key indicator for global health. Better information on function is critical in light of global demographic shifts and increases in chronic conditions, and AI technologies are well-poised to address this need. This workshop brings together members of the AI and health communities interested in function to chart the course of this area of research.


W06Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 7, 5pm – 10pm JSTJoint Workshop on Human Brain and Artificial Intelligence (HBAI 2020)The quest for brain research (BR) is to uncover the nature of brain cognition, consciousness, and intelligence. Artificial Intelligence (AI) is committed to realizing machine-borne intelligence. The development of these two fields is undergoing a continuous trend of convergence. The Human Brain and Artificial Intelligence (HBAI) aim at bringing together active researchers and practitioners in the frontiers of AI and human BR for the presentation of original research results. It provides an opportunity for the exchange and dissemination of innovative research ideas relevant to both fields. HBAI will contribute to answering the following two questions: How can AI techniques help to human brain research (brain computing)? And, how can human brain research inspire the study of AI (brain-inspired computing)? The discussion on the workshop will clearly be great helpful to brain and cognitive science, neural computation and artificial general intelligence, brain-machine interface, brain science+, AI, and their applications.


W08Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 7, 5pm – 10pm JST4th Workshop on Artificial Intelligence in Affective Computing (AffComp)In recent years, research in affective computing has led to advances across multiple modes of affective expression: affective speech recognition, sentiment understanding and natural language processing in context, new models for facial expression classification, and novel multi-modal data collection and applied machine learning strategies beyond personal computing. Our workshop will focus on the convergence of methodologies that contribute to detecting emotional and psychometric patterns: machine learning algorithms, wearables, Internet of Things (IoT), emotion elicitation strategies, creating affect-related datasets and methodologies for learning while preserving privacy. We also invite papers that help us understand the limitations of current methods of affective algorithms and can help inform regulatory policy around affective computing. Relevant active research areas of include: facial affect and usability; affective content; social influence; non-human affect; affective bias, safe AI, and ethical factors; deep learning from biometric, video, and other affective data; medical devices and fog/edge computing in affect.


W09Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JSTAI for Social GoodThis workshop will explore how artificial intelligence can contribute to solving social problems. For example, what role can AI play in promoting health, access to opportunity, and sustainable development? How can AI initiatives be deployed in an ethical, inclusive, and accountable manner? To address such questions, this workshop will bring together researchers and practitioners across artificial intelligence and a range of application domains. The objective is to share the current state of research and practice, explore directions for future work, and create opportunities for collaboration. The workshop will feature a mix of invited talks, contributed talks, and posters. Submissions spanning the full range of theoretical and applied work are encouraged.


W10Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JST2nd AI-based Multimodal Analytics for Understanding Human Learning in Real-World Educational Contexts (AIMA4Edu)Human learning is a complex interactive and iterative process that takes place at a very fine grained level. However, our ability to understand and support this fascinating latent learning process is often limited by what we can perceive and how we can measure. Recent advances of sensing technology and accompanying techniques for processing multimodal data, which manifest the psychological as well physiological processes during the human learning process, give us a new opportunity to look at this classical problem with a new pair of lens. The emerging new type of data includes, but not limited to, student’s physiological signals such as EKG or EEG waveforms, students’ speech, facial expressions and postures, within the context of particular learning activities. In this AIMA4EDU workshop, we expand topic areas to include nascent methodological areas and work beginning to apply multimodal data and AI to support learners.


W11Jan 7, 5pm – 10pm JST4th International Workshop on Multi-Agent Path FindingThe Multi-agent Path Finding Problem (MAPF) takes as input a team of agents that need to plan collision-free paths from their current locations to their target locations. MAPF has been shown to be NP-hard for several different cost functions, yet one must find high-quality collision-free paths for the agents quickly. Recent years have seen a significant rise of different formulations of the MAPF problem and diverse appreaches with varying complexities, properties and applications. This workshop aims to gather the MAPF community in order to present new and ongoing research, discuss issues that pertain to high-quality research and crass-fertilize ideas between different groups.


W14Jan 7, 5pm – 10pm JST Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JSTData Science Meets Optimization (DSO)This workshop on the close relationship and interplay between data science and optimisation continues on the DSO@IJCAI2019 workshop at the International Joint Conference on Artificial Intelligence 2019 in Macao as well as on the DSO@IJCAI-ECAI workshop in 2018 at FAIM in Stockholm. Invited are studies on how techniques from combinatorial optimization and mathematical programming can be enforced by learning from historical data and on how such advanced techniques can contribute to machine learning and data mining. The DSO workshop is closely related to the DSO working group of The Association of European Operational Research Societies (EURO) with yearly streams and workshops at major conferences such as EURO 2018 in Valencia, EURO 2019 in Dublin, IFORS 2017 in Quebec, CPAIOR 2017 in Padua, CEC 2017 in San Sebastian.


W15Jan 7, 5pm – 10pm JSTMonte Carlo Search 2020Monte Carlo Search is a family of general search algorithms that have many applications in different domains. It is the state of the art in perfect and imperfect information games. Other applications include the RNA inverse folding problem, Logistics, Multiple Sequence Alignment, General Game Playing, Puzzles, 3D Packing with Object Orientation, Cooperative Pathfinding, Software testing and heuristic Model-Checking. In recent years, many researchers have explored different variants of the algorithms, their relations to Deep Reinforcement Learning and their different applications. The purpose of this workshop is to bring these researchers together to present their research, discuss future research directions, and cross-fertilize the different communities. Researchers and practitioners whose research might benefit from Monte Carlo Search in their research are welcome.


W16Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 7, 5pm – 10pm JST1st International Workshop on Heuristic Search in IndustryAs an effective method for solving complex optimization problems, heuristic search has been widely used in industry, including logistics, digital maps, cloud computing, as well as manufacturing, among others. Work on heuristic search has a long tradition in AI, and there has been much progress over the last few decades. Advanced techniques in heuristic search are highly relevant for a range of real-world applications. On the other hand, real-world industrial applications give rise to interesting data sets and problems in this areas, and can also reveal bottlenecks and limitations of existing methods. The goal of this workshop is to bring together experts on heuristic search from academia and industry, and to promote real-world applications of heuristic search.


W17Jan 7, 5pm – 10pm JSTAI for Internet of Things (AI4IoT 2020)The Internet of Things (IoT) is the internetworking of physical devices with embedded electronics and an internet address that can transfer data without human interaction. Examples are wearable devices, environmental sensors, factory machinery, devices in homes and buildings, or vehicle components. These connected devices produce an exponentially growing amount of data including sensor data in time series format, image, sound and video data. Today, most of this data is unused. This workshop will explore how AI techniques can be used to (i) Make sense of these vast amounts of IoT data, (ii) Reason about connected physical systems and environments, (iii) Assist humans with the execution of actions.


W18Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JST1st International Workshop on Harmonious and Symbiotic Interaction in AI & Robotics (HSIAR2020)Harmonious and symbiotic interaction in AI & Robotics has been widely studied and are one of the emerging areas of research in the field of AI & Robotics. HSIAR2020 is based on Japanese CREST project of “Intelligent Information Processing Systems Creating Co-Experience Knowledge and Wisdom with Human-Machine Harmonious Collaboration”. This research area will advance research and development targeting intelligent information processing systems that create co-experience knowledge and wisdom through “balanced or harmonious collaboration” of humans and machines including AI & Robotics and bring about an improvement in the quality of the intellectual activities of individuals and groups. The balanced or harmonious and symbiotic collaboration means that not only users but also human society may feel the services of machines (or systems) acceptable in the human-machine collaboration. HSIAR2020 brings together researchers to discuss and present the state of the arts on this area.


W19Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JSTRobot Dialogues – Dialogue Models for Human-Robot InteractionLarge communities in AI, robotics and interaction technology already work on spoken language-based human-robot interaction. Their different starting points and assumptions call for discussions, exchange of ideas and more integrated approaches to implementations and modelling of spoken dialogues on robot platforms. This one-day workshop offers a platform for researchers to discuss and elaborate their views at the intersection of AI, robotics and spoken dialogue modelling. Sophisticated interaction models and implementations are critical in this endeavour but are not often explicitly addressed. Dialogue modelling and dialogue system implementations, on their part, are often developed without sufficiently considering how the models could be used in an embodied robotic system which also interacts with the environment. The workshop offers a platform for discussions concerning appropriate architectures and representations, in order to build a joint understanding of the aspects and features that address the pertinent questions in the multidisciplinary field of robot dialogues.


W20Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 7, 5pm – 10pm JSTArtificial Intelligence for Anomalies and NoveltiesAnomalies are referred to as observations that are significantly different from the majority of observations, while novelties are observations from novel classes that are unseen during learning. Recognition, detection and/or adaption of anomalies/novelties are some of the most active research areas in multiple communities, such as data mining, machine learning and computer vision. Some of the relevant well-established research areas include anomaly/outlier detection, out-of-distribution example detection, adversarial example recognition and detection, open-set recognition and adaption, and they have broad applications in a variety of domains, such as fintech, healthcare, cybersecurity, safety in AI systems, etc. Some of these areas have been extensively explored for decades, but there are still many open problems in these areas due to some unique nature of anomalies and novelties, such as rareness, heterogeneity, unknowingness and uncertainty. This workshop aims to promote the development and applications of anomaly and novelty recognition, detection and adaption techniques.


W21Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JST2nd International Workshop on Bringing Semantic Knowledge into Vision and Text UnderstandingExtracting and understanding the high-level semantic information in vision and text data is considered as one of the key capabilities of effective artificial intelligence (AI) systems. Due to the success of deep representation learning, we have observed increasing research efforts in the intersection between vision and language for a better understanding of semantics, such as image captioning, visual question answering, etc. Besides, the vast amount of external semantic knowledge could assist in having a “deeper” understanding of vision and/or text data, e.g., describing the contents of images in a more natural way, constructing a comprehensive knowledge graph for movies, building a dialog system equipped with commonsense knowledge, etc. This workshop will provide a forum for researchers to review the recent progress of vision and text understanding, with an emphasis on novel approaches that involve a deeper and better semantic understanding of vision and text data.


W22Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JST2nd Workshop on Financial Technology and Natural Language Processing (FinNLP)The aim of this workshop is to provide a forum where international participants can share knowledge in applying NLP to the FinTech domain. Recently, in the financial fields, FinTech is a new industry that focuses on improving financial activity with technology. Thus, the aim of this workshop is to bridge the gap between NLP researches and financial applications. With the sharing of the researchers in FinNLP, the challenging problems of blending FinTech and NLP will be identified, and the future research direction will be shaped. That can broaden the scope of this interdisciplinary research area. There are two shared tasks collocated with FinNLP-2020, including “Learning Semantic Representations for the Financial Domain” and “Sentence Boundary Detection in PDF Noisy Text in the Financial Domain.” We offer the prize for the best paper in the main track and the best-performing teams in the shared tasks.


W23Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JSTLinguistic and Cognitive Approaches to Dialogue Agents (LACATODA)Linguistic and Cognitive Approaches to Dialog Agents (LaCATODA) is a multidisciplinary workshop for researchers whose work could be useful for developing sophisticated dialog agents (we welcome both methods for achieving more natural machine-generated conversation and theoretical studies of human communication which are difficult to mimic algorithmically). By combining Natural Language Processing and Machine Learning methods with cognitive architectures or philosophy of mind, we could discover novel approaches for machines that understand us, our environment, and our feelings. In this context, we see a role for NLP and cognitive science to play in developing a new generation of user- friendly, more autonomous but still safe systems which, through interaction with the user and the world, can learn how to reason, behave or speak naturally. We are interested in research tackling common sense knowledge and reasoning, affective computing, cognitive methods, learning from broad sets of data, and acquiring knowledge / language.


W24Jan 7, 5pm – 10pm JST Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JSTAI4NarrativesIt is important to gather the knowledge on AI means, concepts and tools for Narrative Extraction, Representation and Generation and to join the AI community on these topics. This includes AI fields such as NLP, Machine Learning, Knowledge Representation, Inference, Planning, Graphical Communication and Image Processing. Applications include health care (patient stories), media (news outlets), communication science, business and reporting (data stories), industry (transparency) and arts (story generation, graphical depiction of stories). This workshop aims bringing together AI researchers and practitioners working on the topic of Narratives, mainly on NLP, but open to other relevant inputs in this emerging area. We invite researchers and practitioners to submit research papers, demo papers, position papers and nectar papers.


W25Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JSTNeuro-Cognitive Modeling of Humans and EnvironmentsRecent advances in AI help improving our understanding on dynamic human crowd motion and behavior. These advances provide essential grounds for modeling and simulating human crowd under various environmental conditions such as architectural structures (e.g. buildings, stations, stadiums, museums, airports). There is a growing recent interest in identifying relationship between human (crowd) behavior and the built environmental structures, utilizing recent developments in AI and machine learning techniques as well as incorporating findings from perceptual, cognitive principles. This inaugural IJCAI-PRICAI 2020 Workshop aims to initiate the first-of-its-kind gathering of multidisciplinary experts interested in this area. This multidisciplinary approach combines cognitive principles and many different areas of machine learning to study the relationship between human behavior and the spaces they inhabit. It will also provide a platform for discussion on collecting appropriate data and challenges in the future gatherings.


W26Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JSTTensor Network Representations in Machine LearningTensor Networks (TNs) are factorizations of high order tensors into networks of low order tensors, which have been studied in quantum physics, chemistry and applied mathematics. TNs have been increasingly applied to machine learning and AI fields for modeling mutlimodal data, compressing deep neural networks, and scaling up algorithms to high-dimensional data. In particular, TNs have been successfully used to tackle challenging problems in data completion, model compression, multimodal fusion, multitask learning and learning theory. TNs are rapidly emerging and finding many interesting applications in machine learning, including modeling probability functions and implementing efficient TN computations in GPU. However, the topic of TNs in machine learning is relatively young and many open problems are still to be explored. This workshop will promote discussions among researchers investigating innovative TNs technology for fundamental theory and algorithms for ML and deep learning, and applications in computer vision, biomedical image processing, NLP, etc.


W27Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JSTKnowledge-Based Reinforcement Learning (KBRL)In recent years, deep Reinforcement Learning (RL) has been widely used in various domains including computer games, robotics, vision, and language. For applications in real-world environments, state of the art reinforcement learning algorithms suffer from a wide range of challenges such as sample inefficiency, safety constraints, partial observability, dynamic environments, hidden rewards in systems, and explainability. We believe that incorporating knowledge can potentially solve many of the most pressing challenges facing reinforcement learning today. The primary goal of this workshop is to facilitate community building: we hope to bring researchers together to consolidate this line of research and foster collaboration in the community.


W28Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JST6th Workshop on Semantic Deep LearningThis 6th Workshop on Semantic Deep Learning (SemDeep-6) aims at bringing together Semantic Web (SW) and Deep Learning (DL) research as well as industrial communities. Both disciplines have had a remarkable impact in data and knowledge analysis, as well as knowledge representation, and in fact constitute two complementary directions for modeling linguistic phenomena and solving semantically complex problems. SemDeep-6 addresses the open research question of how Semantic Web technologies can be united with state-of-the-art machine learning approaches in general, with a special focus on how to contribute to Explainable AI (XAI) this year. Given the success of last year’s challenge, we will continue this collaboration and SemDeep-6 will be joined by Target Sense Verification for Words in Context (WiC-TSV), which will extend the WiC dataset in several ways, such as hypernyms and definitions as well as two domain-specific datasets.


W29Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JSTLearning Data Representation for ClusteringThis workshop aims at discovering the recent advanced on data representation for clustering under different approaches. Thereby, the LDRC workshop is an opportunity to (i) present the recent advances in data representation based clustering algorithms; (ii) outline potential applications that could inspire new data representation approaches for clustering; and (iii) explore benchmark data to better evaluate and study data representation based clustering models.


W30Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JST2nd International Workshop on Deep Learning for Human Activity RecognitionHuman activity recognition (HAR) can be used for a number of applications, such as health-care services and smart home applications. Recently, deep learning has achieved great success in many challenging research areas, such as image recognition and natural language processing. The key merit of deep learning is to automatically learn representative features from massive data. This technology can be a good candidate for human activity recognition. Some initial attempts can be found in the literature. However, many challenging research problems in terms of accuracy, device heterogeneous, environment changes, etc. remain unsolved. This workshop intends to prompt state-of-the-art approaches on deep learning for human activity recognition.


W32Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JSTFederated Machine Learning for Data Privacy and ConfidentialityIn order to explore how the AI research community can adapt to a more privacy conscious world, we organize a one-day workshop on Federated Learning for data privacy and user confidentiality. The workshop will focus on machine learning systems adhering to the privacy-preserving and security principles. Technical issues include but not limit to data collection, integration, training and modelling, both in the centralized and distributed setting. The workshop intends to provide a forum to discuss the open problems and share the most recent and ground-breaking work on the study and application of secure and privacy-preserving compliant machine learning. Both theoretical and application-based contributions are welcome.


W34Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JSTApplied Mechanism DesignThe aim of the workshop is to provide an internationally respected forum for scientific research and proposal in the fundamental challenges of mechanism design for real-world applications such as resource allocation, task allocation, and preference aggregation. As a crucial field of game theory, research on mechanism design has brought many novel solutions to the practice such as Google’s ad auctions, kidney exchanges, student-school matching, online recommendation, online QnA and digital/sharing economy platforms. Mechanism design has played an essential role in these systems to, for example, incentivize the users to behave in a desirable manner and optimize the resource/task allocations. Due to the tremendous development of IoT and social networks, system design has to consider the users’ swift reaction and collision formation via their social interactions and also the heavy computational costs. We need to investigate new mechanisms to handle these new challenges in both theory and practice.


W35Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JST3D Artificial Intelligence Challenge through 3D-FUTURE BenchmarkThe goal of the workshop is to facilitate innovative research on high quality 3D shape understanding and generation, and to build a bridge between academic research and 3D applications in industry. Towards this goal, we release 3D-FUTURE (3D FUrniture shape with TextURE) which contains 20,000+ clean and realistic synthetic scenes in 5,000+ diverse rooms which contain 10,000+ unique industrial 3D instances of furniture with high resolution informative textures developed by professional designers. Building on 3D-FUTURE, we propose the Alibaba 3D Artificial Intelligence Challenge 2020 with three tracks: 1) Image-based 3D shape retrieval, 2) 3D object reconstruction, and 3) 3D shape assisted instance segmentation. In addition, a discussion panel is included in the workshop to provide a forum for potential research topics such as the recovery of both 3D shape and texture from 2D images.


W36Jan 7, 9am – 2pm JSTWorkshop on AI and BlockchainsThe workshop will offer a systematic linkage between AI and blockchains and explore research challenges that arise at the forefront of AI and a broad range of Blockchain applications. The workshop will bring together researchers in Computer Science, Finance, Statistics, and Data Science, from academia, industry and the government, and will create an open interdisciplinary forum for discussing recent advances at the intersection of AI and Blockchains. In doing so, we aim to better understand the practical requirements of this domain and limitations of our current methodology – thereby, inspiring development of new algorithms for Blockchain Data analytics and leveraging blockchains for trustworthy AI applications.


W38Jan 7, 5pm – 10pm JST Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JSTWorkshop on Artificial Intelligence Safety (AISafety)In the last decade, there has been a growing concern on risks of AI. Safety is becoming increasingly relevant as humans are progressively ruled out from the decision/control loop of intelligent, and learning-enabled machines. In particular, the technical foundations and assumptions on which traditional safety engineering principles are based, are inadequate for systems in which AI algorithms, in particular Machine Learning (ML) algorithms, are interacting with the physical world at increasingly higher levels of autonomy. The AISafety workshop seeks to explore new ideas on safety engineering, as well as broader strategic, ethical and policy aspects of safety-critical AI-based systems. As part of this 2-days workshop, we organise a full-day workshop on the AI Safety Landscape initiative. This initiative aims at defining an AI safety landscape providing a “view” of the current needs, challenges and state of the art and the practice of this field.


W40Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JST2nd Workshop on AI & Food (AIxFood)Food and cooking analysis present exciting challenges for modern AI, particularly in the context of multimodal data. A meal is a product of a progression of cooking stages, captured in recipes. Ingredients change physical properties, combine with other ingredients, all to produce a final, highly variable, appearance of the meal. Recognizing food items from images or videos, their amount or calories, food attributes such as flavors, the cooking action plan, or creating robotic assistants to help users complete the cooking process, is of essential scientific value yet technically extremely challenging. 2nd AIxFood Workshop aims to bring together researchers from academia and industry with interest in AI, nutrition and cooking. The workshop will focus on fundamental AI and machine learning problems, such as fine-grained object recognition, cross-modal retrieval & captioning, activity understanding, mutlimodal reference resolution, human-robot interaction, and design of novel user interfaces & experiences in the context of food AI.


W41Jan 8, 9am – 2pm JST Jan 8, 5pm – 10pm JSTExplainable Artificial Intelligence (XAI)As AI becomes more ubiquitous, complex and consequential, the need for people to understand how decisions are made and to judge their correctness becomes increasingly crucial due to concerns of ethics and trust. The field of Explainable AI (XAI), aims to address this problem by designing AI whose decisions can be understood by humans. This workshop aims to bring together researchers working in explainable AI to share and learning about recent research, with the hope of fostering meaningful connections between researchers from diverse backgrounds, including but not limited to artificial intelligence, human-computer interaction, human factors, philosophy, cognitive & social psychology.







",2020
